North Carolina, session 2025, HB1135.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective upon the convening of the 2027 General Assembly and
applicable to travel occurring on or after that date, G.S. 120-3.1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) In addition to compensation for their services, members of the General Assembly
shall be paid the following allowances:
(1) A weekly travel allowance for each week or fraction thereof that the General
Assembly is in regular or extra session. The amount of the weekly travel
allowance shall be calculated for each member by multiplying the actual
round-trip mileage from that member's home to the City of Raleigh by the rate
per mile which is the business standard mileage rate set by the Internal
Revenue Service in Rev. Proc. 93-51, December 27, 1993.IR-2024-312,
Notice 2025-5, December 19, 2024.
(2) A travel allowance at the rate which is the business standard mileage rate set
by the Internal Revenue Service in Rev. Proc. 93-51, December 27, 1993,
IR-2024-312, Notice 2025-5, December 19, 2024, whenever the member
travels, whether in or out of session, as a representative of the General
Assembly or of its committees or commissions, with the approval of the
Legislative Services Commission.
(3) A subsistence allowance for meals and lodging at a daily rate equal to the
maximum per diem rate for federal employees traveling to Raleigh, North
Carolina, as set out at 58 Federal Register 67959 (December 22, 1993), 89
Federal Register 67093 (August 19, 2024), while the General Assembly is in
session and, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, while the
General Assembly is not in session when, with the approval of the Speaker of
the House of Representatives in the case of Representatives or the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate in case of Senators, the member is:
a. Traveling as a representative of the General Assembly or of its
committees or commissions, or
b. Otherwise in the service of the State.
A member who is authorized to travel, whether in or out of session,
within the United States outside North Carolina, may elect to receive, in lieu
of the amount provided in the preceding paragraph, a subsistence allowance
*H1135-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of twenty-six dollars ($26.00) a day for meals, plus actual expenses for
lodging when evidenced by a receipt satisfactory to the Legislative Services
Officer, the latter not to exceed the maximum per diem rate for federal
employees traveling to the same place, as set out at 58 Federal Register
67950-67964 (December 22, 1993) and at 59 Federal Register 23702-23709
(May 6, 1994).89 Federal Register 67093 (August 19, 2024).
(4) A member may be reimbursed for registration fees as permitted by the
Legislative Services Commission."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the General Assembly
the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for costs
associated with implementing, and offsetting the costs of, the rate changes authorized by this act.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1135-First Edition